District of Columbia statutes.
47-4649

Abatement of real property taxes for 4427 Hayes Street, N.E.

The real property described as Lot 120, Square 5129, and any improvements thereon, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title during tax years 2011 through 2040; provided, that the total tax exemption provided by this section shall not exceed $30,000 a year.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 722(b), 58 DCR 1008
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7122, 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “tax years 2011 through 2040; provided, that the total tax exemption provided by this section shall not exceed $ 30,000 a year” for “tax years 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, and 2015; provided, that the total tax exemption provided by this section shall not exceed $ 140,000.”
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-4649, see § 722(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7092 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Short title: Section 721 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle C of title VII of the act may be cited as “4427 Hayes Street, N.E., Real Property Tax Abatement Act of 2010”.